Hawaii statutes.
[CHAPTER
657D]

CIVIL
RELIEF FOR STATE MILITARY FORCES

Part I. General Provisions

Section

657D-1 Definitions

657D-2 Territorial application; jurisdiction of
courts;

form of procedure

657D-3 Protection of persons secondarily liable

657D-4 Notice of benefits to persons in and
persons

entering military service

657D-5 Extension of benefits to persons ordered
to report

for state military service

657D-6 Effect on rights, remedies, etc., pursuant
to

written agreements entered after
commencement of

military service

657D-7 Exercise of rights not to affect lenders,
credit, or

insurers

Part II. General Relief

657D-11 Default judgments; affidavits; bonds;
attorneys for

persons in service

657D-12 Stay of proceedings where military service
affects

conduct thereof

657D-13 Fines and penalties on contracts

657D-14 Restrictions

657D-15 Duration and term of stays; co-defendants
not in

service

657D-16 Statutes of limitations as affected by
period of

service

657D-17 Maximum rate of interest

657D-18 Limitation prescribed by state tax laws as
affected

by period of service

Part III. Rent, Installment Contracts,
Mortgages,

Liens, Assignments, Leases

657D-21 Eviction or distress during military
service; stay;

penalty for noncompliance; allotment of
pay for

payment

657D-22 Installment contracts for purchase of
property

657D-23 Mortgages, trust deeds, and other
securities

657D-24 Settlement of cases involving stayed
proceedings to

foreclose mortgage on, resume possession
of, or

terminate contract for purchase of,
personal

property

657D-25 Termination of leases by lessees

657D-26 Life insurance policies; penalties

657D-27 Extension of benefits to dependents

Part IV. Insurance

657D-31 Definitions

657D-32 Persons entitled to benefits;
applications; amount

of insurance protected

657D-33 Form of application; reports to insurance

commissioner by insurer; policy deemed
modified

upon application for protection

657D-34 Determination of policies entitled to
protection;

notice to parties; lapse of policies for
nonpayment

of premiums, etc.

657D-35 Rights and privileges of insured during
period of

protection

657D-36 Deduction of unpaid premiums upon
settlement of

policies maturing during protection

657D-37 Guarantee of premiums and interest by
State;

settlement of amounts due upon expiration
of

protection; subrogation of state crediting
debt

repayments

657D-38 Rules; finality of determinations

Part V. Taxes and Public Lands

657D-41 Taxes respecting personalty, money,
credits, or

realty; sale of property to enforce
collection;

redemption of property sold; penalty for
nonpayment;

notice of rights to beneficiaries of
section

657D-42 Rights to public lands not forfeited;
grazing lands

657D-43 Income taxes; collection deferred;
interest; statute

of limitations

Part VI. Administrative Remedies

657D-51 Transfers to take advantage of chapter

657D-52 Certificates of service; persons reported
missing

657D-53 Revocation of interlocutory orders

Part VII. Further Relief

657D-61 Stay of enforcement of obligations,
liabilities,

taxes

657D-62 Power of attorney

657D-63 Reinstatement of health insurance coverage
upon

release from service

Cross References

Vehicle weight tax exemption for active duty personnel, see
§249-6.5.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next